Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions

§ 65-7-1.
Jurisdiction over county roads; width of roads; drainage; inclusion of new roads in official records.

The board of supervisors of each county shall have full jurisdiction over all matters relating to the public roads of the county, including the establishment, laying out, opening, abandonment, altering, changing, working and maintaining of such roads, except as otherwise provided by Section 170 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

All roads now laid out and opened or hereafter laid out and opened according to law shall be deemed public roads and highways and shall be opened and worked at least sixteen (16) feet wide, wherever practicable, and in any case not less than twelve (12) feet, and any greater width that may be necessary. Ditches and borrow pits shall be kept open or connected so as to drain off the water from the road bed, as far as practicable.

From and after July 1, 2000, no road shall be included as a part of the county road system until and unless the board of supervisors, by appropriate action spread on its minutes, has established or accepted such road and caused the road to be included in the official record of the county road system as provided in Section 65-7-4.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art. 7 (25); 1857, ch. 15, art. 8; 1871, § 2334; 1880, § 821; 1892, § 3887; 1906, § 4394; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7074; 1930, § 6310; 1942, § 8286; Laws, 1920, ch. 274; Laws, 1998, ch. 539, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 65-7-3.
Standard for working roads.

All public roads shall be kept open and worked to the width required by law and, when necessary, shall be raised in the middle and sloped toward the ditches or sides, which shall be kept open and of sufficient size and proper fall to drain the road bed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3903; 1906, § 4413; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4093; 1930, § 6313; 1942, § 8287.

§ 65-7-4.
County road systems; official maps; register; hearings; additions, deletions, and changes.

On or before July 1, 2000, the board of supervisors of each county shall prepare and adopt an official map designating and delineating all public roads on the county road system. Changes to the county road system shall be recorded on this map as soon as is reasonably possible. The map, as it is periodically revised, shall be kept on file in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors where it shall be available for public inspection.

On or before July 1, 2000, the board of supervisors of each county shall prepare and adopt a county road system register in which shall be entered:

The number and name of each public road on the county road system.

A general reference to the terminal points and course of each such road.

A memorandum of every proceeding in reference to each such road, with the date of such proceeding, and the page and volume of the minute book of the board of supervisors where it is recorded; however, reference to proceedings before July 1, 2000, shall not be required.

Before the initial adoption of the official map and the county road system register, the board of supervisors shall hold a public hearing on the content of the official map and the county road system registry and shall publish notice of the hearing at least one (1) time, not less than two (2) weeks before the date of the hearing, in a newspaper having general circulation in the county.

All subsequent proceedings and changes to the county road system shall be recorded in the county road system register as soon as is reasonably possible. The county road system register, as it is periodically revised, shall be kept on file in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors where it shall be available for public inspection.

From and after July 1, 2000, the official record of the county road system shall consist of an official map, as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, and the county road system register, as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. The county road system register shall have priority in case of conflict between the register and the official map. The minutes of the board of supervisors containing proceedings with respect to county roads and the county road system shall serve as the official record until such proceedings are recorded on the official map and in the county road system register. The official record of the county road system, at a minimum, shall be revised and updated on or before July 1 of each year.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the initial official record of the county road system prepared and adopted in accordance with this section shall include all public roads that the board of supervisors determines, consistent with fact, as of July 1, 2000, or such date the initial official record is adopted, are laid out and open according to law. From and after July 1, 2000, no road shall be added or deleted from the county road system or otherwise changed except by order or other appropriate action of the board of supervisors and such action shall be recorded in the minutes of the board. All additions, deletions or changes to the county road system shall be recorded in the official record of the county road system as provided for in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 539, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 65-7-4.1.
Legislative intent.

The Legislature of the State of Mississippi finds and determines as a matter of public policy and legislative intent that the proceedings and public hearing required for initial adoption of the official map and county road system register required by Section 65-7-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, are not intended to lay out, open, designate or otherwise establish new public roads, but to document and record existing roads which are, at the time of the initial adoption of said map and register, adjudicated by the board, consistent with fact, to be public roads by dedication, under the methods provided by statute, or by prescription and required by public convenience and necessity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2000.).

§ 65-7-5.
Order of board of supervisors necessary to change road.

It shall not be lawful for any person to turn, alter, or change any public road unless by order of the board of supervisors, under penalty of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for each offense; and an old road shall not be obstructed until the new road is in all respects fit for travel.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art. 7 (35); 1857, ch. 15, art. 7; 1871, § 2335; 1880, § 822; 1892, § 3888; 1906, § 4395; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7075; 1930, § 6314; 1942, § 8288.

§ 65-7-7.
Road not to be obstructed.

If any person shall fell any bush or tree and leave any portion thereof in any stream or on any public highway, road, or ditch draining the roadway or obstruct the same in any manner whatever, and not immediately remove the obstruction, the overseer of the road shall remove the same, and the person so felling the tree or bush, or otherwise obstructing the road or water shall forfeit and pay all expenses of removing the same, to be recovered before any justice of the peace of the county, in the name of the county. It is the duty of the overseer to cause suit to be commenced therefor, and such person shall be liable for all damages occasioned to another by the obstruction. However, no cattle gap placed on a county road, subject to overflow by the Mississippi River and not protected by levees, shall be considered an obstruction in the public road if such cattle gap is installed with the permission of the board of supervisors and the person installing same also provides a gate adjacent to the road for the passage of stock.

Any violation of this section shall also, upon conviction, be punishable as provided under Section 99-19-31.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art. 7 (32); 1857, ch. 15, art. 24; 1871, § 2361; 1880, § 855; 1892, § 3889; 1906, § 4396; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7076; 1930, § 6315; 1942, § 8289; Laws, 1962, ch. 451; Laws, 1972, ch. 473, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 8, 1972).

§ 65-7-9.
Dangerous trees to be removed from road.

The board of supervisors of any county shall have the right, upon the application of any member thereof or any overseer, road commissioner or the county road manager, to condemn any dead or dangerous trees or timber near any public road which endangers the safety of the public travel. On the failure or refusal of the owner to cut and remove such trees or timbers, the board may assess the value thereof and pay or tender the owner of such trees or timber the said assessed value thereof by warrant on the county treasury, and such trees or timber shall be cut, felled or removed by the proper authorities working or maintaining such road. The owner of such trees or timber shall have five (5) days’ notice of such assessment and, if dissatisfied with such valuation, an appeal may be had to the circuit court as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6316; 1942, § 8290; Laws, 1924, ch. 219; Laws, 1988, Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 33, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-11.
Hedges on roadside to be trimmed.

When hedges are planted along any public road, the owner of the land shall trim the hedges on the side next to the road and keep them trimmed, so that travelers will not be inconvenienced thereby. If the hedges intrude upon any road, the overseer shall give written notice to the owner or occupant of the land to have the hedges trimmed within ten days after notice, so as not to obstruct the road or interfere with travelers; otherwise, the owner or occupant shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, punished as for obstructing a public highway. Such owner or occupant shall forfeit two dollars per day for every day’s failure to comply with such notice, to be recovered by action.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 15, art. 25; 1871, § 2362; 1880, § 356; 1892, § 3890; 1906, § 4398; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7078; 1930, § 6317; 1942, § 8291.

§ 65-7-13.
Public highways to be marked.

For all counties where this has not already been done, the state highway department or the state highway engineer shall prepare and file with the clerk of the board of supervisors of the said several counties of the state, plans and specifications for highway sign or guide boards, showing the construction, size, material, color, and how said sign or guide boards are to be erected on the roads or highways within the said several counties. All such specifications are to be uniform, so as to obtain a uniform system of highway sign or guide board markers throughout the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6318; 1942, § 8292; Laws, 1926, ch. 224.

§ 65-7-15.
Board of supervisors to erect signs.

The board of supervisors of the several counties of the state shall forthwith erect or cause to be erected, at all forks, crossroads or road intersections on all of the state highways and all other principal roads within their county, sign or guide boards in compliance with specifications theretofore furnished by the state highway department or state highway engineer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6319; 1942, § 8293; Laws, 1926, ch. 224.

§ 65-7-17.
Color and construction of sign or guide boards.

All such sign or guide boards throughout the entire state shall be of uniform size, construction, color, and erection. Said sign or guide boards shall show thereon the next city, town, or village to be reached by following each fork of said road, and the distance to be traveled along such road to reach said city, town, or village. All such sign or guide boards as may be erected at forks or crossroads on the main or trunk roads within such county shall indicate direction along said road and distance to the county seat of the county or the principal city, town, or village within said county, and the principal city, town, or village within next adjoining county located on such main or trunk roads.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6320; 1942, § 8294; Laws, 1926, ch. 224.

§ 65-7-19.
Mandamus available to erect signs.

In case the boards of supervisors of the several counties or if any one of them fail or refuse to erect or cause to be erected such sign or guide boards as provided in Sections 65-7-15 and 65-7-17, then upon a petition to the circuit court by as many as twenty-five qualified electors, who are also taxpayers on real property in the county, joining in said petition, the remedy by way of mandamus shall apply and shall be fully available to enforce the provisions of the said two sections. The said petitioners of the number and qualifications aforesaid shall be deemed to possess all the necessary interest and to be fully entitled to demand, in the proceeding by mandamus, the enforcement by the court of all the duties aforementioned, and the court may upon the trial make all proper orders fully for said enforcement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6321; 1942, § 8295; Laws, 1926, ch. 224.

§ 65-7-21.
Signs not to be damaged.

The board of supervisors of the several counties and the overseers shall, at all times after the erection of the sign or guide boards as provided, see that said sign or guide boards are not defaced, removed, or destroyed. In case of defacement, removal, or destruction of any such sign or guide board, the board of supervisors shall cause a new sign or guide board to be erected within ninety days; and on failure so to do, the duty may be enforced as provided in Section 65-7-19.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6322; 1942, § 8296; Laws, 1926, ch. 224.

§ 65-7-23.
Defacing, removing or destroying signs or traffic control devices prohibited; penalties; liability for cost of repair; liability of parents of minor.

Any person willfully defacing, removing, marring, damaging or destroying any sign or guide board, including any railroad crossing sign or flasher signal, or other traffic control device erected as provided shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be liable for the actual cost of replacing or repairing such sign and shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or be imprisoned in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or be punished by both such fine and imprisonment. If the offender is a minor, the parents of such minor shall be civilly liable in accordance with Section 93-13-2 for the actual cost of replacing or repairing the sign, signal or device.

The penalties prescribed in subsection (1) of this section shall also be applicable to any person, and to the parents of any minor, who willfully defaces, mars or damages any bridge, underpass or overpass.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section regarding a memorial, other historical or cultural marker or sign, the value of which is Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned in the county jail for up to six (6) months or fined up to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both. Such person shall also be ordered to make full restitution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6323; 1942, § 8297; Laws, 1926, ch. 224; Laws, 1977, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-7-25.
Signal boards for highway “danger zones.”

The boards of supervisors of the several counties of this state are required, within sixty days after receipt of a petition signed by twenty-five or more regular travelers of any public highway within their respective county, to have prepared and properly posted along said highway certain sign or signal boards at such intervals as may be deemed necessary to avoid danger for speedy travel, not exceeding four to the mile, with such inscriptions written thereon as will sufficiently warn the traveling public of the danger zones thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259h; 1930, § 6324; 1942, § 8298; Laws, 1918, ch. 220.

§ 65-7-27.
Specifications for signal boards.

Said signal or signboards shall be made of some suitable material with a face of not less than twelve by eighteen inches (12" x 18"), which shall be painted white with the lettering or inscription thereon printed or written in black. The inscription upon said signal or signboards shall consist of the following words, to wit: “danger zone” or some like suitable inscription; and the same, when so done, shall constitute sufficient notice to all travelers along said road of any and all defects in said road within said danger zone.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259i; 1930, § 6325; 1942, § 8299; Laws, 1918, ch. 220.

§ 65-7-29.
Double boards for dangerous places.

At such intervals on said road as may be deemed extremely dangerous, such board shall be double faced, with said inscription on each side thereof, and shall be placed in such manner as to be easily seen by travelers at night when proper lights upon vehicles are reflected thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259j; 1930, § 6326; 1942, § 8300; Laws, 1918, ch. 220.

§ 65-7-31.
Payment of signal board expenses.

The expense of preparing and erecting said signal or signboard shall be paid out of the road funds of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259k; 1930, § 6327; 1942, § 8301; Laws, 1918, ch. 220.

§ 65-7-33.
Vehicles to sound warnings in danger zone.

All wheeled vehicles traveling over or upon said roads so designated by said signal or signboards, when operated by steam, gas, or electricity, shall be equipped with a whistle, horn, or other signal which shall be duly sounded upon approaching said danger zones, so indicated by said signal or signboards.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259l; 1930, § 6328; 1942, § 8302; Laws, 1918, ch. 220.

§ 65-7-35.
Penalty for violating danger zone laws.

Any person guilty of a violation of Sections 65-7-25 through 65-7-33 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than Five Dollars ($5.00) for each violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259m; 1930, § 6329; 1942, § 8303; Laws, 1918, ch. 220.

§ 65-7-37.
Regulation of use of certain roads.

Whenever in the discretion of the board of supervisors of any county it seems proper to do so, the board of supervisors may, by order duly entered on its minutes, regulate the use of any hard surfaced or graveled public road in the county by prescribing what kind of wheels may be used on vehicles on said public roads and by prohibiting the use thereon of vehicles using cleats or spikes on wheels. But such order shall, before being in full force and effect, be published in a newspaper published in the county for three (3) consecutive weeks, whereupon such order shall be in full force and effect.

In the event of inclement weather, floods, or other causes wherein immediate nonuse of any of such roads is necessary, the supervisor of the district may enter his proclamation prohibiting the use of said road for such period of time as he deems necessary for the proper preservation thereof, or enter his proclamation regulating the type of traffic that may use such road. However, at the next meeting of the board of supervisors, such supervisor as has entered such a proclamation must present his proclamation to the entire board for its action thereon, and if the full board declines to enter an order in the manner set forth in the next preceding paragraph hereof, then the proclamation of such supervisor shall be null and void and of no further effect. Notice of such proclamation at each public entrance, intersection with another public road, shall be sufficient notice of the proclamation of the supervisor.

This section shall not be construed as to authorize the board of supervisors to prohibit vehicles with spiked or cleated wheels from crossing or going from one side of said road to another, and shall only be construed so as to authorize said board of supervisors to prohibit the use of said spiked or cleated wheels on said public roads.

This section shall not be so construed as to apply to state built or constructed highways or federal aid roads, and shall only be construed to apply to public roads maintained by the county.

Any person going upon any hard surfaced road or portion thereof in such county with any kind of vehicle, or who shall cause any such vehicle to be driven upon any such hard surfaced road in such county in violation of such regulations or orders, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction therefor, shall be fined in the sum of not exceeding Fifty Dollars ($50.00) and shall moreover be liable severally to any county or road district for any damage done such roads by such illegal act.

As to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, the duties of a supervisor under this section relating to the issuance of a proclamation shall be performed by the road manager of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8304; Laws, 1938, ch. 321; Laws, 1962, ch. 267; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 34, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-39.
Traveling on public roads.

All drivers of carriages or other vehicles, whether of burden or pleasure, using any public road shall keep to the right hand when met by another carriage or vehicle and when overtaken by another carriage or vehicle, so as in both cases to permit the carriage or vehicle so meeting or overtaking to pass free and uninterrupted. Any person wilfully offending against this provision shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, fined Five Dollars ($5.00) for each offense; and if injury result therefrom, the person so offending shall be subject to an action for damages at the suit of the party injured.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 15, art. 32; 1871, § 2370; 1880, § 864; 1892, § 3902; 1906, § 4412; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7092; 1930, § 6331; 1942, § 8305.

§ 65-7-41.
Rate of travel over bridges.

It shall not be lawful for any person to drive a wagon, carriage, or other vehicle of any description drawn by animal power or to ride, leap, or drive any horse, mule, or any description of cattle over or upon any bridge erected in any county by authority of the board of supervisors or in a city, town, or village at a faster gait than a walk; and every person so offending shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, fined Five Dollars ($5.00). But the board of supervisors or municipal authorities shall cause to be fixed up and kept at each end of the bridge, in some conspicuous place, a board on which shall be painted in large letters, “Five Dollars ($5.00) fine for riding or driving any animal over this bridge at a faster gait than a walk”; and on neglect of such notice, such fine shall not be incurred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 15, art. 40; 1871, § 2378; 1880, § 872; 1892, § 3939; 1906, § 4452; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7136; 1930, § 6332; 1942, § 8306.

§ 65-7-43.
Prevent damage and protect public roads.

The board of supervisors of any county pursuant to the maximum load limits established in Chapter 5, Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the posting authority granted in Section 63-5-27(5) may declare what is or may be an unusual or uncommon load or weight to be conveyed on or over the roads, bridges or approaches of any bridges in the county; shall have power to protect their roads and bridges from any unusual or uncommon use where the same is likely to injure or impair their usefulness as public highways; and may recover damages for injuries.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4397; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7077; 1930, § 6333; 1942, § 8307; Laws, 1983, ch. 332, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1983).

§ 65-7-45.
Maximum loads of vehicles.

The board of supervisors of any county in this state may, at the discretion of such board, regulate the maximum load of any vehicle using the public roads and bridges of such county, or any section or length of any public road, or any particular bridge in such county by order spread on its minutes, which order shall, before being in full force and effect, be first published in a newspaper published in the county for three (3) consecutive weeks, whereupon such resolution shall be in force and effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259w; 1930, § 6334; 1942, § 8308; Laws, 1918, ch. 204; Laws, 1983, ch. 332, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1983).

§ 65-7-47.
Penalty for violating load and tire regulations.

Any person going upon any public road or bridge in such county with any kind of vehicle, or who shall cause any vehicle to be driven upon any public road or bridge in such county, in violation of such regulations shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction be fined in any sum not exceeding Fifty Dollars ($50.00), and shall moreover be liable civilly to any county or road district for any damage done to such roads or bridges by such illegal act.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259x; 1930, § 6335; 1942, § 8309; Laws, 1918, ch. 204.

§ 65-7-49.
Posting notices.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

It shall be the duty of all road overseers and road commissioners whose road is affected by the order of the board of supervisors provided by Sections 65-7-43 through 65-7-47 to see that a notice thereof is posted at conspicuous places on such road at intervals of not less than two (2) miles and at the approaches to any bridge affected thereby; but a failure to post such notice shall not be allowed as a defense to a criminal prosecution or civil suit under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259y; 1930, § 6336; 1942, § 8310; Laws, 1918, ch. 204; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 35, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-49.
Posting notices.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

It shall be the duty of the county road manager whenever a county road is affected by the order of the board of supervisors provided by Sections 65-7-43 through 65-7-47 to see that a notice thereof is posted at conspicuous places on such road at intervals of not less than two (2) miles and at the approaches to any bridge affected thereby; but a failure to post such notice shall not be allowed as a defense to a criminal prosecution or civil suit under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259y; 1930, § 6336; 1942, § 8310; Laws, 1918, ch. 204; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 35, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 332, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1983).

[Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259z; 1930, § 6337; 1942, § 8311; Laws, 1918, ch. 204]

§ 65-7-53.
Use of roads while under construction.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Whenever in the discretion of the board of supervisors of any county it seems proper so to do, the board may, by order on its minutes, authorize the commission of any road district within the county, or the engineer of such commission, to forbid the use of any hard surfaced road, or portion thereof, when under construction or repair. The Highway Commission or its engineer, when so authorized by the board of supervisors, may close said road or any portion thereof to travel by an obstruction placed thereon in such manner as to indicate its closing, or by a sign marked “closed by order of the Highway Commission.”

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259t1; 1930, § 6338; 1942, § 8312; Laws, 1920, ch. 264; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 36, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-53.
Use of roads while under construction.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Whenever in the discretion of the board of supervisors of any county it seems proper so to do, the board may, by order on its minutes, authorize the road manager of the county or the county engineer to forbid the use of any hard surfaced road, or portion thereof, when under construction or repair. The county road manager or the engineer, when so authorized by the board of supervisors, may close said road or any portion thereof to travel by an obstruction placed thereon in such manner as to indicate its closing, or by a sign marked “closed by order of the county road manager (or county engineer).”

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259t1; 1930, § 6338; 1942, § 8312; Laws, 1920, ch. 264; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 36, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-55.
Penalty for forbidden use of roads.

Any person who uses such road while the same is closed, or removes such obstruction or sign, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) and not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and shall be responsible in damages to the highway commission for all damage done to the highway in violation of Section 65-7-53.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259u1; 1930, § 6339; 1942, § 8313; Laws, 1920, ch. 264.

§ 65-7-57.
Petition to have roads laid out or changed.

When any person shall desire to have a public road other than a road being maintained by the state highway department laid out, altered, or changed, a petition shall be presented to the board of supervisors of the county, signed by ten or more freeholders or householders of the county interested in the road, setting forth the commencement and termination and general course thereof and that the public interest or convenience requires the road to be laid out and opened or altered or changed, as shown in the petition. The petitioners, if not owners of the land through which the road runs or is proposed to be run, or if the land through which the road runs or is proposed to run is owned by the county or a municipality, shall give a copy of the same to the president of the board of supervisors if the county is the owner of the land, or to the mayor if a municipality is the owner thereof, and shall give five days’ notice to the owners of the land in person, or by leaving the same at their residence if they reside in the county, or if the owners be nonresidents of the county, by putting up the notice in some conspicuous place on the land through which the road runs or is proposed to run. Thereupon the board of supervisors shall hear the parties, and if it determine that the prayer of the petitioners ought to be granted, in whole or in part, it shall appoint a committee of two members, of districts other than that of the road or proposed road, who shall examine and view the contemplated route of the road. If they find the same practicable, they shall lay out and mark the road, or the alteration or change, and report their proceedings in writing to the board at its next meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art. 9(1); 1857, ch. 15, art. 1; 1871, § 2336; 1880, § 823; 1892, § 3892; 1906, § 440; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7080; 1930, § 6340; 1942, § 8314; Laws, 1926, ch. 226.

§ 65-7-59.
Report of committee.

The report of the committee may be set aside by the board of supervisors, for sufficient cause, and a new committee appointed at the discretion of the board; but if confirmed, the report shall be entered at large in the minutes of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 15, art. 3; 1871, § 2338; 1880, § 825; 1892, § 3893; 1906, § 4401; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7081; 1930, § 6341; 1942, § 8315.

§ 65-7-61.
Damages for taking land.

When any owner of land or other person shall claim compensation for land taken for a public road, or for damages sustained by the construction of a road, he shall petition the board of supervisors, in writing, at the next meeting after the laying out of the road or at the meeting when the report thereof shall be returned, setting forth the nature and character of the damages claimed, whereupon the board shall, on five days’ notice to the petitioner, go upon the premises and assess the damages sustained by him. The finding of the board shall be in writing, signed by the members agreeing to it, and must be entered on the minutes at the next meeting; but if the damages sustained and claimed be less than the cost of assessing, the board may allow the same without inquiry.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art. 9(3); 1857, ch. 15, art. 4; 1871, § 2339; 1880, § 826; 1892, § 3894; 1906, § 4402; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7082; 1930, § 6342; 1942, § 8316.

§ 65-7-63.
Water to be drained from roads.

The board of supervisors shall have power, whenever necessary, to drain water off the public roads through and over the adjacent lands, and damages may be allowed and paid to the owners of said adjacent lands in the same manner as is provided in regard to locating public roads.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4403; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7083; 1930, § 6343; 1942, § 8317.

§ 65-7-65.
Damages paid from county treasury.

The damages assessed and allowed by the board shall be paid out of the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3895; 1906, § 4404; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7084; 1930, § 6344; 1942, § 8318.

§ 65-7-67.
Review by circuit court.

All proceedings of the board of supervisors in laying out, altering, or changing any public road and assessing damages therefor may be reviewed by the circuit court in respect to any matter of law arising on the face of the proceedings; and on the question of damages the cause may be tried anew, and the damages may be assessed by a jury if the owners of the land so desire. The board of supervisors shall grant appeals for that purpose, when prayed for, on the appellant giving bond for the costs in such penalty as the board may require, not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), payable to the county; and such bond shall have the same effect and be subject to the same proceedings as appeal bonds in other cases. Any person interested and a taxpayer may appeal in like manner and with like effect from the action of the board in assessing, allowing, or disallowing damages in opening or changing a road. If the road laid out or changed is a part of a federal aid project, such appeal to, and such review by, the circuit court shall be without supersedeas and only after the assessment of damages herein provided; on such appeal and review, all of the proceedings involving the taking of land for a public road and assessing damages therefor, and otherwise, shall be before the circuit court for consideration on such review and appeal. If the road laid out or changed is a part of a federal aid project, after the board of supervisors has confirmed the report of the committee examining and viewing the contemplated route of a road and finding the same practicable, such road may be opened, worked, constructed, and used, and such opening, working, constructing, and using of said road shall not be stopped or held up by appeal, by writ of supersedeas, writ of certiorari, direct appeal, other method of appeal, review, by writ of prohibition, or otherwise after the board of supervisors has entered an order on its minutes to the effect that the county shall be liable to the landowner for all damages sustained by such laying out, working, and construction of such road and the taking of the land therefor; and the board of supervisors shall have actually deposited the amount assessed as damages with the clerk of the circuit court, subject to the order of the landowner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 15, art. 9; 1871, § 2342; 1880, § 830; 1892, § 3896; 1906, § 4405; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7085; 1930, § 6345; 1942, § 8319; Laws, 1928, ch. 155.

§ 65-7-69.
Roads on rights of way of drainage districts.

The board of supervisors may construct public roads along the side of and on the right of way of drainage canals or on any levees of any drainage districts of their respective counties, and for this purpose may use the dumps of earth taken from any canal or ditch, either as a road bed or otherwise, provided that no such road shall be constructed without the consent of the commissioners of the drainage district affected, and paying all damages to landowner. Before establishing and constructing said public road, a written resolution of the commissioners of the drainage district agreeing to the establishing of said road shall be presented to the board of supervisors, and said resolution shall be and constitute a part of the order of the board of supervisors establishing the public road. Said road shall not be so constructed as to interfere with the drainage of lands in the drainage district, and the same shall not be so constructed as to hinder or impede the drainage canals for the use and purpose for which they were constructed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259r1; 1930, § 6346; 1942, § 8320; Laws, 1920, ch. 263.

§ 65-7-71.
Payment for right of way so taken.

Where the board of supervisors of any county uses the right of way or ditch banks or any levee of any drainage district created in this state, it may pay to the treasurer of the respective drainage districts the value of any right of way taken for road purposes, as done with private individuals.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259s1; 1930, § 6347; 1942, § 8321; Laws, 1920, ch. 263.

§ 65-7-73.
Roads into experiment stations.

In any county in the State of Mississippi in which there is located a branch experiment station, the boards of supervisors of such counties are hereby authorized, in their discretion, to open up, lay out, construct, and maintain public roads into and across the land owned by the State of Mississippi and used in connection with said branch experiment station. No petition shall be required to have such road opened up, laid out, constructed, and maintained, but the boards of supervisors of such counties are authorized to proceed with such work when requested so to do by the manager in charge of said branch experiment station. Boards of supervisors are hereby authorized to expend the funds of said county in opening up, laying out, constructing, and maintaining said roads.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8321.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 65-7-74.
Roads, driveways and parking areas on public school property.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to construct, maintain and/or repair roads, driveways and parking areas into and on all property owned by any public school district within such county, and the expenditure of funds for such construction, repairs and maintenance is hereby authorized from any available funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 342, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1974).

§ 65-7-75.
Line roads.

Whenever it is necessary to lay out a public highway at or near or along the line between two adjoining counties, and on account of the topography of the land it is not expedient to lay out said road on the line between said adjoining counties, then the boards of supervisors of both counties may lay out the road near the adjoining line between said counties, and both of said counties shall bear the expense of constructing and maintaining such public road in any proportion mutually agreed upon by the boards of supervisors of both of said counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8329; Laws, 1932, ch. 216.